North Carolina statutes. Chapter 85B. Auctions and Auctioneers.
§ 85B-5.
Licensing of nonresidents.

Any person who holds a valid auctioneer license in another state may apply for and be granted a reciprocal North Carolina license if the resident state in which the person is licensed has minimum training or experience standards which are acceptable to the Commission but are not more lenient than those required by this Chapter, if the resident state extends similar reciprocal privileges to auctioneers who are residents of and licensed by the State of North Carolina.

An applicant under this section shall submit an application and other documentation and proof of eligibility for licensure as may be required by the Commission, but shall not be required to take the examination required under

G.S. 85B-4

. Applicants shall pay the appropriate fee under

G.S. 85B-6

and shall file with the Commission an irrevocable consent that service on the Executive Director of the Commission shall be sufficient service of process for actions against the applicant by a resident of this State arising out of his auctioneering activities.

An applicant under this section shall make the contribution to the Fund as required by

G.S. 85B-4.1

. Any license issued under this section shall be marked to indicate that its holder is a nonresident reciprocal licensee.

A license issued pursuant to this section shall be valid from the date of issuance to the following June 30 and may be renewed from year to year unless suspended or revoked pursuant to the provisions of this Chapter or rule of the Commission, provided that the licensee continues to be a resident of and duly licensed in good standing in the licensee’s resident state.

Any person licensed under this section shall notify the Commission of the lapse, surrender, suspension, revocation, or any other act amounting to a loss of license in the person’s resident state. The notice must be sent to the Commission, by certified mail, return receipt requested, within 10 days of the occurrence.

Any person licensed under this section shall provide the Commission with written notice of any change of business address or residence within 10 days of the occurrence.

Any license issued under this section shall be immediately suspended or revoked based upon the occurrence of any of the events set out in subsection (e) of this section or based upon a change of principal state residence of the reciprocal licensee.

Any person whose license is terminated as a result of a change of principal state residence may reapply for reciprocal status provided the person is otherwise eligible for a license based upon the new state residence, and submits with the application the fees required by the Commission.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, a reciprocal licensee who subsequently becomes a domiciliary of the State of North Carolina may request, by application, that the reciprocal license be converted to that of an in-State licensee without having to take the State exam required by

G.S. 85B-4

. The Commission may, however, require an applicant to pay processing and application fees it deems appropriate.

History.

1973, c. 552, s. 5; 1983, c. 603, s. 5; c. 751, ss. 9-11; 1989, c. 732, s. 4; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 819, s. 17.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “In Defense of Occupational Licensing: A Legal Practitioner’s Perspective,” see 43 Campbell L. Rev. 423 (2021).

§ 85B-6.
Fees; local governments not to charge fees or require licenses.

The Commission shall collect and remit to the State Treasurer fees in an amount not to exceed the following:

Click to viewAn application fee for a license and an examination fee are nonrefundable. The amount payable by a nonresident under

G.S. 85B-5

to obtain a nonresident reciprocal auctioneer license is the greater of the amount set in the above table for an examination for and the issuance of an auctioneer’s license and the amount the nonresident’s state would charge a resident auctioneer of this State to obtain a comparable license from that state.A reinstatement fee is payable when a person applies for renewal of a license after the license has lapsed for failure to renew it before it expired. The reinstatement of a lapsed license is not retroactive in effect and does not limit the authority of the courts or of the Commission to take disciplinary action against a person who engages in the auctioneer profession with a lapsed license.

No local government or agency of local government may charge any fees or require any licenses for auctioneers, apprentice auctioneers, or auction firms in addition to those set out in this Chapter.

Item Maximum Fee: Apprentice Auctioneers: $ 125.00 Application for license 125.00 Issuance or renewal of license Auctioneers:
125.00 Application for license
75.00 Examination
250.00 Issuance or renewal of license Auction Firms: 125.00 Application for license
75.00 Examination
250.00 Issuance or renewal of license Reinstatement of License
75.00.

History.

1973, c. 552, s. 6; c. 1195, s. 3; 1975, c. 648, s. 5; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1219, s. 43.7; 1983, c. 751, s. 12; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 819, s. 18; 1993, c. 421, s. 1; 1999-142, s. 6.

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

If an auctioneer travels into a city or county in which he does not maintain a regular place of business and sells or auctions property owned by him, he must obtain an itinerant merchant license pursuant to G.S. 105-53(d), as well as comply with any ordinances of the particular city or county governing itinerant merchants. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. DeWitt S. McCarley, City Attorney, Greenville, North Carolina, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 38 (1985).

An auctioneer is not deemed to be an itinerant merchant if he travels into a city or county in which he does not maintain a regular place of business and auctions merchandise belonging to another person, whether or not that person maintains a regular place of business in the particular city or county. Therefore, such an auctioneer would not be required to comply with G.S. 105-53(d) or any local ordinances of the particular city or county governing itinerant merchants. However, if the owner of the goods to be auctioned off does not maintain a regular place of business in the particular city or county, that person would be required to comply with G.S. 105-53(d) and any local ordinances governing itinerant merchants. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. DeWitt S. McCarley, City Attorney, Greenville, North Carolina, 55 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 38 (1985).

§ 85B-7.
Conduct of auction; records.

No licensee shall conduct an auction in this State without first having a written agreement with the owner of any property to be sold. The agreement must contain the terms and conditions upon which the auctioneer received the goods for sale. The licensee shall provide the owner with a signed copy of the agreement and shall keep at least one copy for his own records for two years from the date of the agreement. Copies of all contracts shall be made available to the Commission or its designated agent upon request.

Each licensee shall maintain consignment records and enter in them, upon receipt of goods for auction and before sale, the name and address of the person who employed the licensee to sell the goods at auction and the name and address of the owner of the goods to be sold. The consignment record shall contain an adequate description of the goods to be sold and shall be sufficient to positively identify each item. Consignment records shall be open for inspection by the Commission or its designated agent at reasonable times.

All licensees shall have their licenses available at each auction they conduct.

Each licensee shall maintain sales records, which identify the purchaser of all goods sold by name, address, and when possible, telephone number. The sales records shall contain an adequate description of the items sold and must be sufficient to positively identify the owner of the property. Sales records shall be maintained for a period of not less than two years from the date of sale. Sales records shall be open for inspection by the Commission or its designated agent at reasonable times.

History.

1973, c. 552, s. 7; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 819, s. 19; 2005-330, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-330, s. 5, effective August 26, 2005, in subsection (b), substituted “consignment records” for “accounting records” and deleted “their” preceding “sale” in the first sentence, added the present second sentence, and substituted “Consignment records” for “The accounting records” at the beginning of the third sentence; and in subsection (d), substituted “maintain sales records, which” for “maintain records which” in the first sentence.

§ 85B-7.1.
Handling clients’ funds.

Each licensee who does not disburse all funds to the seller on auction day shall maintain a trust or escrow account and shall deposit in the account all funds that are received for the benefit of another person and are not disbursed to the seller on auction day. The licensee shall deposit funds that are not disbursed on auction day with a federally insured depository institution or a trust institution authorized to do business in this State. At or before the time of all final settlements, the auctioneer shall provide the seller or consignor with a settlement statement, which includes a description of all goods sold, the selling price of the goods sold, the net proceeds due to the seller or consignor, the name and address of the person receiving the disbursement, and the amount of the disbursement. All settlement statements shall be signed by the licensee or the licensee’s agent and by the person receiving the disbursement.

Each licensee shall maintain, for not less than five years, complete records showing the deposit, maintenance, and withdrawal of trust or escrow funds and the disbursement of funds on auction day. Records of the disbursement of funds on auction day shall include a copy of each receipt or settlement statement issued when the funds were disbursed. The Commission or its designated agent may inspect these records periodically, without prior notice, and may also inspect these records whenever the Commission determines that they are pertinent to an investigation of any specific complaint against a licensee.

History.

1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 819, s. 20; 1993, c. 421, s. 2; 2005-330, s. 6; 2017-25, s. 1(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-330, s. 6, effective August 26, 2005, in subsection (a), inserted “who does not disburse all funds to the seller on auction day” near the beginning of the first sentence and rewrote the third and fourth sentences.

Session Laws 2017-25, s. 1(d), effective June 2, 2017, substituted “a federally insured depository institution or a trust institution authorized to do business in this State” for “an insured bank or savings and loan association located in North Carolina” in the second sentence of subsection (a).

§ 85B-8.
Prohibited acts; assessment of civil penalty; denial, suspension, or revocation of license.

The following shall be grounds for the assessment of a civil penalty in accordance with G.S. 85B-3.1(b) or the denial, suspension, or revocation of an auctioneer, auctioneer apprentice, or auction firm license:

Any violation of this Chapter or any violation of a rule or regulation duly adopted by the Commission.

A continued and flagrant course of misrepresentation or making false promises, either by the licensee, an employee of the licensee, or by someone acting on behalf of and with the licensee’s consent.

Any failure to account for or to pay over within a reasonable time, not to exceed 30 days, funds belonging to another which have come into the licensee’s possession through an auction sale.

Any false, misleading, or untruthful advertising.

Any act of conduct in connection with a sales transaction which demonstrates bad faith or dishonesty.

Knowingly using false bidders, cappers or pullers, or knowingly making a material false statement or representation.

Commingling the funds or property of a client with the licensee’s own or failing to maintain and deposit in a trust or escrow account in a federally insured depository institution or a trust institution authorized to do business in this State funds received for another person through sale at auction.

Failure to make the required contribution to the Fund.

The commission or conviction of a crime that is punishable as a felony offense under the laws of North Carolina or the laws of the jurisdiction where committed or convicted, or the commission of any act involving fraud or moral turpitude.

Failure to properly make any disclosures or to provide documents or information required by this Chapter or by the Commission.

A demonstrated lack of financial responsibility.

through (d) Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1195, s. 5.

(e)

The Commission may investigate complaints and conduct hearings as follows:

The Commission may upon its own motion or upon the complaint in writing of any person, provided the complaint and any evidence presented with it establishes a prima facie case, hold a hearing and investigate the actions of any auctioneer, apprentice auctioneer, or auction firm, or any person who holds himself or herself out as an auctioneer or apprentice auctioneer, and shall have the power to impose a civil penalty on any licensee, suspend or revoke any license issued under the provisions of this Chapter, or to reprimand or censure any licensee. In all proceedings for the imposition of a civil penalty or the denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses, the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes including provisions relating to summary suspension shall be applicable. Any person who desires to appeal the denial of an application for any license authorized to be issued under this Chapter shall file a written appeal with the Commission not later than 30 days following notice of denial.

The Commission may, upon its own motion, summarily suspend a license when the health, safety, or welfare of the public is at risk, such as in the event of a potential loss of consigned items or potential loss of funds.

(f)

A person whose license has been denied, suspended, or revoked may not apply in that person’s name or in any other manner within the period during which the order of denial, suspension, or revocation is in effect, and no firm, partnership, or corporation in which any person has a substantial interest or exercises management responsibility or control may be licensed during the period.

History.

1973, c. 552, s. 8; c. 1195, ss. 4, 5; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 648, s. 6; 1983, c. 603, s. 6; 1989, c. 732, s. 5; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 819, s. 21; 1999-142, s. 7; 2005-330, s. 7; 2017-25, s. 1(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-330, s. 7, effective August 26, 2005, in subsection (e), designated the existing provisions as subdivision (1), and added the introductory paragraph and subdivision (2).

Session Laws 2017-25, s. 1(e), effective June 2, 2017, substituted “a federally insured depository institution or a trust institution authorized to do business in this State” for “an insured bank or savings and loan association located in North Carolina” in subdivision (a)(7).

§ 85B-9.
Penalties and enforcement.

Any person, corporation or association of persons violating the provisions of G.S. 85B-4(a) shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Attorney General of North Carolina, or the Attorney General’s designee, shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the district attorneys of this State to prosecute violations of this Chapter.

The Commission may in its own name seek injunctive relief in the General Court of Justice to restrain any violation or anticipated violation of the provisions of G.S. 85B-4(a) or any violation of this Chapter.

The Commission shall be entitled to the services of the Attorney General of North Carolina in enforcing the provisions of this Chapter or may employ an attorney to assist and represent it in enforcement of specific matters.

History.

1973, c. 1195, s. 6; 1975, c. 648, s. 7; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 819, s. 22; 1993, c. 539, s. 600; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-142, s. 8.